California, session 20252026, AB95.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 11900) is added to Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read:SECTION 1. Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 11900) is added to Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 12.5. California Education Interagency Council11900. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Education Interagency Council.11901. For purposes of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:(a) “Council” means the California Education Interagency Council established pursuant to Section 11902.(b) “Managing entity” means the Office of the California Education Interagency Council established pursuant to Section 11904.11902. The California Education Interagency Council is hereby established in the Government Operations Agency for the purpose of accomplishing all of the following goals:(a) Proactively evaluating and addressing the changing nature of work and the economy, and supporting the advancement of state educational attainment, equity, and workforce goals.(b) Integrating and aligning efforts across elementary and secondary education, postsecondary education, employers, and the statewide workforce system, and maximizing the impact of federal and state funding investments to ensure effective student pathways to quality work and well-paying careers and to contribute to economic growth.(c) Increasing collaboration across postsecondary education and the workforce development systems statewide, and with employers to ensure flexibility and support for meeting the skill-building and upskilling needs of adults.(d) Working in regions throughout the state to ensure that education supply and statewide workforce demand are aligned.(e) Being a forum for communication to discuss the impacts of proposed intersegmental and cross-sector issues, including, but not limited to, changes to elementary, secondary, and postsecondary education graduation requirements, including California State University and University of California admissions changes.11903. (a) The council’s membership shall include all of the following members, or a designee of the member who reports directly to the member:(1) The President of the State Board of Education.(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.(3) The President of the University of California.(4) The Chancellor of the California State University.(5) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(6) The Chief of the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.(7) The Secretary of the Labor and Workforce Development.(8) The Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.(9) The Director of Finance.(b) The council’s meetings shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1).(c) The council’s members shall serve without compensation but shall receive reimbursement for necessary expenses.(d) The Governor shall designate one member listed in subdivision (a) to serve as the council’s chairperson.11904. (a) The Office of the California Education Interagency Council is hereby established in the Government Operations Agency.(b) The Office of the California Education Interagency Council shall also be known as the “managing entity,” and shall serve as a neutral administrative body to carry out the purpose and intent of this chapter.(c) The managing entity shall be overseen by an executive officer. The executive officer shall be appointed by the Governor. The executive officer shall be exempt from civil service consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.11905. (a) The council’s first meeting shall be held on or before December 31, 2025.(b) Subsequent meetings of the council shall be held at least once every six months after the first meeting.(c) Within one year of its first meeting, the council shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data in order to access Cradle-to-Career Data System data and reports.(d) Within 18 months of its first meeting and every 5 On or before November 30, 2026, and every six years thereafter, the council shall adopt a strategic plan to guide the council and its staff in achieving the council’s goals outlined in Section 11902.(e) (1) On or before November 30, 2026, or no later than 60 days after the first strategic plan is adopted pursuant to subdivision (d), the council shall biennially release a work plan after consultation with the chair of the Assembly Committee on Education, the chair of the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the chair of the Senate Committee on Education, the Governor, and other interest holders. The work plan may include the establishment of workgroups, committees, or task forces necessary to effectively meet the goals and objectives provided in the most recently adopted strategic plan. The work plan shall describe the timelines, deliverables, and interest holders that will be consulted as part of the work identified in the work plan.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature and the Governor that any work emanating from the strategic or work plans, as part of the consultation process described in paragraph (1), shall include relevant interested holders, including, but not limited to, students, parents, teachers, faculty, staff, associations, employers, labor organizations, experts, and other public entities that have relevant content jurisdiction or expertise.(f) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5, within 18 months of its first meeting and annually subsequent to the release of the first work plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), and biennially thereafter, the council shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795, and the Governor on the outcomes of the council’s the previous two years of work under this chapter and any recommendations to advance transitional kindergarten to postsecondary education, inclusive, intersegmental student pathway efforts aligned to careers.(f)(g) Within three two years of its first meeting, the council shall establish a faculty and employer advisory committee to discuss emerging skills issues related to changing skills needs and student learning.(g)(h) Within three two years of its first meeting, the council shall develop a mechanism for increasing engagement with industry and employers to support experiential learning. The council shall evaluate options, including, but not limited to, paid internship opportunities, fellowships, service learning, and apprenticeships. apprenticeships for high school and postsecondary education, as appropriate.11906. The council, with support from the managing entity, shall perform all of the following duties:(a) (1) Evaluate a variety of data sources to inform, pursuant to paragraph (2), the Legislature and the Governor of the supply of, and projected demand for, jobs in major occupational or career areas and in-demand skills and sectors at least every two years. Each evaluation shall include economic forecasting and analysis to ensure educators can plan for emerging skills needs in areas critical to California’s economy.(2) Include, in the report required in subdivision (e) (f) of Section 11905, the information gathered from an evaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) (1) Review available data to annually biennially identify both statewide and regional progress towards achieving goals and addressing gaps in demand for both of the following:(A) Postsecondary education admission, enrollment, success, and awards of degrees, credentials, and certificates.(B) Employment, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status, and any additional categories of students as determined by the council.(2) Include in the report required by subdivision (e) (f) of Section 11905 the findings from the annual review conducted pursuant to paragraph (1).(c) (1) Make recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor in the report required by subdivision (e) (f) of Section 11905, as necessary, regarding intersegmental, cross-sector, and interagency initiatives and programs, such as efficiencies in instructional delivery, course alignment, financial aid, or other public benefit programs supporting students, transfer pathways, degree and certificate completion, adult education, including upskilling and reskilling for adults, two- and four-year graduation rates, affordability, and workforce coordination.(2) The recommendations made pursuant to paragraph (1) may include transitional kindergarten to postsecondary education, inclusive, recommendations.(d) Develop and distribute written materials and reports to help educators and others encourage students to pursue education and training opportunities leading to professions in in-demand industries.(e) Support collaborative work to create, refine, or update student pathways, pathways from high school to postsecondary education, including, but not limited to, dual enrollment, associate degree for transfer, and credit mobility.(f) Serve as a forum for discussing and providing advice on the impact of proposed changes to graduation or admissions requirements on California’s education systems.(g) Serve as a forum for discussing strategic planning around mandated federal plans and related state programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) The federal Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act (Public Law 109-270).(2) The federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.).(3) The Strong Workforce Program.(4) Regional K-16 K–16 Education Collaboratives.(5) The Golden State Pathways Program.(h) (1) Coordinate learning opportunities across the elementary and secondary education and postsecondary education systems to ensure students can easily navigate across systems, and increase flexible structures so that students can enter and navigate postsecondary education and workforce training opportunities more easily, including providing support for traditional students and adult workers looking to upskill or reskill for short periods of time.(2) Include, in actions undertaken pursuant to paragraph (1), efforts to expand opportunities for online education, credit for prior learning, and access to competency-based education, to integrate technology and to include ongoing efforts to understand skill development opportunities and frameworks.(i) Provide advice and recommend tools designed to support students across their educational careers. These tools may include, but are not limited to, the Career Passport, the California College Guidance Initiative, and eTranscript California.11907. (a) The managing entity shall support the council. This support shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Supporting and staffing council meetings. meetings, and workgroups, committees, or task forces established in furtherance of the council’s goals described in this chapter.(2) Supporting the council’s development and updates of its strategic plan. and work plans adopted pursuant to this chapter.(3) Supporting the council’s development of policies required to implement this chapter.(4) Gathering necessary research, providing analysis, and developing recommendations for the council under the council’s direction.(b) The managing entity may hire staff or enter into contracts for experts or technical and professional services to support the council’s exercise of its duties pursuant to Sections 11905 and 11906.11908. Regarding exercise of its duties pursuant to Sections 11905 and 11906, and the professional services provided to support the council’s exercise of its duties pursuant to Sections 11905 and 11906, the council shall act solely in an advisory capacity. Neither the state nor any party is required to implement any findings or recommendations of the council unless future legislation explicitly authorizes or requires their implementation.11909. This chapter shall be implemented only upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act to the Government Operations Agency for purposes of implementing this chapter.